test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-taryeTS_gt-norm.yaml
# NB! Following stem-final modifications take place in AccPl stem: ва -> би, ка -> ци, га -> зи
# #+Use/SpellNoSugg
  Noun - тарˮ: # Noun 'hair /(fin) karva' - full paradigm /MDTN-koodi r+ye/
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Nom: тарˮ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Acc: тармʼ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Gen: тарʼ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Dat: тартʼ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Loc: [таркана, тарканя,таркна, таркня]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Abl: таркад
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Pros: [тарˮмна, тарˮмня, тармна, тармня]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Du+Nom: таркʼ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Du+Acc: таркʼ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Du+Gen: таркʼ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Nom: тарˮ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Acc: таре
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Gen: тареˮ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Dat: таркˮ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Loc: [таркаˮна, таркˮна, таркаˮня, таркˮня]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Abl: таркат
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Pros: тареˮмана
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: [тарˮм, тарм]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: [тарˮм, тарм]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: [тарˮн, тарн]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: таркан
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: [тарканан, таркнан, тарканян, таркнян]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: [таркадан, таркдан]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: [тарˮмнан, тармнан, тарˮмнян, тармнян]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: [таркаюн, таркюн]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: [таркаюн, таркюн]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: [таркаюн, таркюн]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: тарен
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: тарен
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: тареˮн
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: таркаˮн
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: [таркаˮнан, таркˮнан, таркаˮнян, таркˮнян]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: [таркатан, тарктан]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: тареˮманан
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: тал
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: тарт
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: тарт
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: тарканд
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: [таркананд, таркнанд, тарканянд, таркнянд]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: [таркаданд, таркданд]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: [тарˮмнанд, тармнанд, тарˮмнянд, тармнянд]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: [таркаюд, таркюд]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Du+Acc+PxSg2: [таркаюд, таркюд]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Du+Gen+PxSg2: [таркают, таркют]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: таред
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: таред
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: тарет
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: таркат
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: [таркаˮнат, таркˮнат, таркаˮнят, таркˮнят]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: [таркатат, тарктат]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: тареˮманат
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: [тарта, тартя]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: [тарта, тартя]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: [тарта, тартя]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: тарканда
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: [таркананда, таркнанда, тарканянда, таркнянда]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: [таркаданда, таркданда]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: [тарˮмнанда, тармнанда, тарˮмнянда, тармнянда]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: [таркаюда, таркюда]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Du+Acc+PxSg3: [таркаюда, таркюда]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Du+Gen+PxSg3: [таркаюта, таркюта]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: тареда
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: тареда
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: тарета
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: [тарката, таркта]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: [таркаˮната, таркˮната, таркаˮнята, таркˮнята]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: [таркатата, тарктата]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: тареˮманата
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: [тарˮмиʼ, тармиʼ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: [тарˮми, тарми] #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: [тарˮмиʼ, тармиʼ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: [тарˮми, тарми] #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: [тарˮниʼ, тарниʼ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: [тарˮни, тарни] #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: [тарканиʼ, таркниʼ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [таркани, таркни] #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: [таркананиʼ, таркнаниʼ, тарканяниʼ, таркняниʼ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: [тарканани, таркнани, тарканяни, таркняни] #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: [таркаданиʼ, таркданиʼ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: [таркадани, таркдани] #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: [тарˮмнаниʼ, тармнаниʼ, тарˮмняниʼ, тармняниʼ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: [тарˮмнани, тармнани, тарˮмняни, тармняни] #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: [таркаюниʼ, таркюниʼ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: [таркаюни, таркюни] #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Du+Acc+PxDu1: [таркаюниʼ, таркюниʼ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: [таркаюни, таркюни] #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Du+Gen+PxDu1: [таркаюниʼ, таркюниʼ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: [таркаюни, таркюни] #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: тарениʼ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: тарени #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: тарениʼ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: тарени #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: тареˮниʼ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: тареˮни #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: [таркаˮниʼ, таркˮниʼ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: [таркаˮни, таркˮни] #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: [таркаˮнаниʼ, таркˮнаниʼ, таркаˮняниʼ, таркˮняниʼ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: [таркаˮнани, таркˮнани, таркаˮняни, таркˮняни] #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: [таркатаниʼ, тарктаниʼ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: [таркатани, тарктани] #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: тареˮмананиʼ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: тареˮманани #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: талиʼ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: тартиʼ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: тартиʼ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: таркандиʼ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: [тарканандиʼ, таркнандиʼ, тарканяндиʼ, таркняндиʼ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: [таркадандиʼ, таркдандиʼ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: [тарˮмнандиʼ, тармнандиʼ, тарˮмняндиʼ, тармняндиʼ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: [таркаюдиʼ, таркюдиʼ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Du+Acc+PxDu2: [таркаюдиʼ, таркюдиʼ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Du+Gen+PxDu2: [таркаютиʼ, таркютиʼ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: таредиʼ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: таредиʼ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: таретиʼ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: [таркатиʼ, тарктиʼ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: [таркаˮнатиʼ, таркˮнатиʼ, таркаˮнятиʼ, таркˮнятиʼ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: [таркататиʼ, тарктатиʼ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: тареˮманатиʼ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: тартиʼ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: тартиʼ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: тартиʼ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: таркандиʼ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: [тарканандиʼ, таркнандиʼ, тарканяндиʼ, таркняндиʼ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: [таркадандиʼ, таркдандиʼ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: [тарˮмнандиʼ, тармнандиʼ, тарˮмняндиʼ, тармняндиʼ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: [таркаюдиʼ, таркюдиʼ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Du+Acc+PxDu3: [таркаюдиʼ, таркюдиʼ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Du+Gen+PxDu3: [таркаютиʼ, таркютиʼ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: таредиʼ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: таредиʼ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: таретиʼ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: [таркатиʼ, тарктиʼ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: [таркаˮнатиʼ, таркˮнатиʼ, таркаˮнятиʼ, таркˮнятиʼ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: [таркататиʼ, тарктатиʼ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: тареˮманатиʼ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: [тарˮмаˮ, тармаˮ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: [тарˮмаˮ, тармаˮ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: [тарˮнаˮ, тарнаˮ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: [тарканаˮ, таркнаˮ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: [таркананаˮ, таркнанаˮ, тарканянаˮ, таркнянаˮ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: [таркаданаˮ, таркданаˮ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: [тарˮмнанаˮ, тармнанаˮ, тарˮмнянаˮ, тармнянаˮ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: [таркаюнаˮ, таркюнаˮ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Du+Acc+PxPl1: [таркаюнаˮ, таркюнаˮ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Du+Gen+PxPl1: [таркаюнаˮ, таркюнаˮ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: таренаˮ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: таренаˮ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: тареˮнаˮ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: [таркаˮнаˮ, таркˮнаˮ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: [таркаˮнанаˮ, таркˮнанаˮ, таркаˮнянаˮ, таркˮнянаˮ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: [таркатанаˮ, тарктанаˮ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: тареˮмананаˮ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: талаˮ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: тартаˮ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: тартаˮ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: таркандаˮ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: [тарканандаˮ, таркнандаˮ, тарканяндаˮ, таркняндаˮ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: [таркадандаˮ, таркдандаˮ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: [тарˮмнандаˮ, тармнандаˮ, тарˮмняндаˮ, тармняндаˮ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: [таркаюдаˮ, таркюдаˮ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Du+Acc+PxPl2: [таркаюдаˮ, таркюдаˮ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Du+Gen+PxPl2: [таркаютаˮ, таркютаˮ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: таредаˮ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: таредаˮ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: таретаˮ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: [таркатаˮ, тарктаˮ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: [таркаˮнатаˮ, таркˮнатаˮ, таркаˮнятаˮ, таркˮнятаˮ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: [таркататаˮ, тарктатаˮ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: тареˮманатаˮ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: [тартоʼ, тартёʼ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: [тартоʼ, тартёʼ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: [тартоʼ, тартёʼ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: таркандоʼ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: [тарканандоʼ, таркнандоʼ, тарканяндоʼ, таркняндоʼ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: [таркадандоʼ, таркдандоʼ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: [тарˮмнандоʼ, тармнандоʼ, тарˮмняндоʼ, тармняндоʼ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: [таркаюдоʼ, таркюдоʼ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Du+Acc+PxPl3: [таркаюдоʼ, таркюдоʼ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Du+Gen+PxPl3: [таркаютоʼ, таркютоʼ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: таредоʼ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: таредоʼ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: таретоʼ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: [таркатоʼ, тарктоʼ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: [таркаˮнатоʼ, таркˮнатоʼ, таркаˮнятоʼ, таркˮнятоʼ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: [таркататоʼ, тарктатоʼ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: тареˮманатоʼ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pred+Abs: тарт
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [тартав, тартув]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: [тартав, тартув]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: тартан
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: тартар
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: тартамд
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: тартанд
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: [тартада, тартда]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: [тартамда, тартмда]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: [тартанда, тартнда]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: [тартамиʼ, тартмиʼ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [тартами, тартми] #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: [тартамиʼ, тартмиʼ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: [тартами, тартми] #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: [тартаниʼ, тартниʼ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: [тартани, тартни] #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: тартриʼ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: [тартамдиʼ, тартмдиʼ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: [тартандиʼ, тартндиʼ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: [тартадиʼ, тартдиʼ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: [тартамдиʼ, тартмдиʼ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: [тартандиʼ, тартндиʼ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: тартваˮ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: тартваˮ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: [тартанаˮ, тартнаˮ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl2: тартраˮ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl2: [тартамдаˮ, тартмдаˮ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl2: [тартандаˮ, тартндаˮ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl3: [тартадоʼ, тартдоʼ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl3: [тартамдоʼ, тартмдоʼ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl3: [тартандоʼ, тартндоʼ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: тартмʼ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: тарт
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: тарˮ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: [тарˮниʼ, тарниʼ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: тартиʼ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: таркʼ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: [тарˮмаˮ, тармаˮ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: тартаˮ
